Utah statutes.
77-36-6.   Enforcement of orders.
(1)  Each law enforcement agency in this state shall enforce all orders of the
court issued pursuant to the requirements and procedures described in this
chapter, and shall enforce:
(a)  all protective orders and ex parte protective orders issued pursuant to
Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 1, Cohabitant Abuse Act;
(b)  jail release agreements, jail release court orders, pretrial protective
orders, and sentencing protective orders; and
(c)  all foreign protection orders enforceable under Title 78B, Chapter 7,
Part 3, Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders
Act.
(2)  The requirements of this section apply statewide, regardless of the
jurisdiction in which the order was issued or the location of the victim or
the perpetrator.
